Washington statutes.
RCW 36.130.010

Definitions.

The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.

(1) "Affordable housing development" means a housing development in which at least twenty-five percent of the dwelling units within the development are set aside for or are occupied by low-income households at a sales price or rent amount that is considered affordable by a federal, state, or local government housing program.

(2) "Dwelling unit" means that part of a housing development that is used as a home, residence, or place to sleep by one person or two or more persons maintaining a common household.

(3) "Housing development" means a proposed or existing structure that is used as a home, residence, or place to sleep by one or more persons including, but not limited to, single-family residences, manufactured homes, multifamily housing, group homes, and foster care facilities.

(4) "Low-income household" means a single person, family, or unrelated persons living together whose adjusted income is less than eighty percent of the median family income, adjusted for household size, for the county where the affordable housing development is located.

[ 2008 c 118 s 2.]